Massachusetts, session 194th, S952.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, item 1596-2418 in Chapter 140 of
the Acts of 2024 is amended by adding after “For MassReconnect, a scholarship program to
provide financial assistance to students from the commonwealth who: (i) are enrolled in and
pursuing a program of higher education at a public community college in the commonwealth”
the following:-
“or a Practical Nursing Program at a Career/Vocational Technical Education School;”
of 1